Utah statutes.
26-36a-209.   State plan amendment.

(1)  The division shall file with the Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services a state plan amendment to implement the requirements of this chapter, including the payment of hospital access payments under Section 26-36a-205 no later than 45 days after the effective date of this chapter.

(2)  If the state plan amendment is not approved by the Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the division shall:

(a)  not implement the assessment imposed under this chapter; and

(b)  return any assessment fees to the hospitals that paid the fees if assessment fees have been collected.

